New Jersey, session 222, S1216.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Transportation shall establish and implement a program to prioritize, to the extent practicable as determined by the Commissioner of Transportation, the use of green stormwater infrastructure methods in the design, construction, reconstruction, and repair of public highways in the State that are funded, in whole or in part, from the Special Transportation Fund established by section 21 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-21). As used in this section: Green stormwater infrastructure methods shall mean management practices that reduce stormwater runoff by allowing stormwater to be treated by vegetation or soils or to be stored and reused, and shall include but not be limited to pervious pavement, bio-retention basins, and grass swales. Public highways shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-3). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.